src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-puqnni_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - puʼnni: # adjectives 193 'eng /est punane/fin' - full paradigm
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Nom: [puʼnni, punni]
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Gen: punīz
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Par: punīzt
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Dat: punīzõn
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Ins: punīzõks
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Ill: punīzõ
     puʼnni+A+Sg+Ela: punīzõst
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Nom: [puʼnnizt, punnizt]
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Gen: [puʼnnizt, punnizt]
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Par: punīži
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Dat: [puʼnniztõn, punniztõn]
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Ins: [puʼnniztõks, punniztõks]
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Ill: punīžiz
     puʼnni+A+Pl+Ela: punīžist
